test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-keahn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - ǩeähn class A40a: # Adjective 'bad/kehno' - full paradigm
    ǩeähn+A+Pred+Sg: ǩeähn
    ǩeähn+A+Pred+Pl: ǩeähn
    ǩeähn+A+Attr: ǩeähnas
    ǩeähn+A+Comp: ǩeähnab
    ǩeähn+A+Superl: ǩeähnmõs
